Washington statutes.
RCW 43.01.900

Terminated entity—Transfer of assets—Reversion of funds—Contractual rights—Rules and pending business—2010 1st sp.s. c 7.

(1) All documents and papers, equipment, or other tangible property in the possession of the terminated entity shall be delivered to the custody of the entity assuming the responsibilities of the terminated entity or if such responsibilities have been eliminated, documents and papers shall be delivered to the state archivist and equipment or other tangible property to the department of enterprise services.

(2) All funds held by, or other moneys due to, the terminated entity shall revert to the fund from which they were appropriated, or if that fund is abolished to the general fund.

(3) All contractual rights and duties of an entity shall be assigned or delegated to the entity assuming the responsibilities of the terminated entity, or if there is none to such entity as the governor shall direct.

(4) All rules and all pending business before any terminated entity shall be continued and acted upon by the entity assuming the responsibilities of the terminated entity.

[ 2015 c 225 s 60; 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 140.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 26; 2010 1st sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 43.03.027.